Washington statutes.
RCW 43.20.260

Review of water system plan, requirements—Municipal water suppliers, retail service.

In approving the water system plan of a public water system, the department shall ensure that water service to be provided by the system under the plan for any new industrial, commercial, or residential use is consistent with the requirements of any comprehensive plans or development regulations adopted under chapter 36.70A RCW or any other applicable comprehensive plan, land use plan, or development regulation adopted by a city, town, or county for the service area. A municipal water supplier, as defined in RCW 90.03.015, has a duty to provide retail water service within its retail service area if: (1) Its service can be available in a timely and reasonable manner; (2) the municipal water supplier has sufficient water rights to provide the service; (3) the municipal water supplier has sufficient capacity to serve the water in a safe and reliable manner as determined by the department of health; and (4) it is consistent with the requirements of any comprehensive plans or development regulations adopted under chapter 36.70A RCW or any other applicable comprehensive plan, land use plan, or development regulation adopted by a city, town, or county for the service area and, for water service by the water utility of a city or town, with the utility service extension ordinances of the city or town.

[ 2003 1st sp.s. c 5 s 8.]

NOTES:

Severability—2003 1st sp.s. c 5: See note following RCW 90.03.015.